Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. Title.

Collateral references. —

7A Am. Jur. 2d, Automobiles and Highway Traffic, §§ 29-34.

60 C.J.S., Motor Vehicles, § 111 et seq.

Liability of state, in issuing automobile certificate of title, for failure to discover title defect, 28 ALR4th 184.

Sec. 28.10.201.
Mandatory and permissive vehicle titles.

Except as otherwise provided in (b) of this section or in AS

28.10.131

,

28.10.152

, and

28.10.181

(hh), every owner of a vehicle subject to registration in this state shall apply for a certificate of title under this chapter.

The owner of a vehicle described in AS

28.10.011

as being exempt from registration and the owner of a snowmobile or off-highway vehicle may not apply for, nor may the department issue, a certificate of title for the vehicle. However, the department

may issue a certificate of title to the owner of a vehicle exempt from registration under AS

28.10.011

(3), (6), (7), or (10) only upon application by that owner; and

except as provided in (e) of this section, shall issue a certificate of title to the owner of a manufactured home upon application, display of evidence of ownership satisfactory to the department, and payment of a fee of $100 by the owner; a certificate of title issued under this paragraph must comply with AS

28.10.231

.

The certificate of title issued may, when there is more than one owner, state the name of each owner in the conjunctive or in the disjunctive in order to indicate that the owners own the vehicle together or in the alternative.

Except for vehicles registered under AS

28.10.131(b)

or (c) or

28.10.152

, the department may not register a vehicle unless the applicant for registration at the same time applies for and obtains a certificate of title under this chapter or presents satisfactory evidence that a certificate of title was previously issued to the applicant. The department may not accept the application for the original certificate of registration or title to a vehicle unless the vehicle is in the state at the time of application. However, the department may accept an application for registration and certificate of title for a vehicle that is not in the state when the application is made by a registered and bonded dealer or by a resident of the state when the application is accompanied by a manufacturer’s statement of origin or, in the case of a used vehicle, when the application is accompanied by a certificate of title issued in another jurisdiction.

The department may not issue a certificate of title to a manufactured home if an application for the manufactured home has been filed under AS

28.10.262

—

28.10.264

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1983; am § 84 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 8 ch 45 SLA 1987; am § 57 ch 63 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 131 SLA 1996; am §§ 16, 17 ch 48 SLA 1998; am §§ 10, 11 ch 64 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 22 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference in paragraph (b)(1) to paragraph (10) of AS

28.10.011

was substituted for paragraph (11) in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that paragraph.

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (b)(2), added “except as provided in (e) of this section,” at the beginning, and substituted “manufactured home” for “mobile home”; and added (e).

The 2013 amendment, effective August 27, 2013, substituted “AS

28.10.131

,

28.10.152

, and

28.10.181

(hh)” for “AS

28.10.131

and

28.10.152

”.

Secs. 28.10.205, 28.10.210.
Personalized plates; tax exemptions. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.211.
Application for title.

The owner of a vehicle required to be titled under this chapter shall apply for title by properly completing and surrendering the forms prescribed by the commissioner and by complying with all applicable laws and regulations, after which the department shall issue a certificate of title.

An application for title or transfer of title must contain

the signature in ink of the owner, or if there is more than one owner, the signature in ink of at least one of the owners and the name of each owner stated in the conjunctive or in the disjunctive; and

any other information reasonably required by the department.

When an application for title refers to a new vehicle, the application must be accompanied by a “manufacturer’s certificate of origin” and other information reasonably required by the department.

An applicant for title to a vehicle transferred by court action on a lien or encumbrance shall surrender to the department a certified copy of the court order involuntarily transferring the vehicle.

If a vehicle to be titled is a specially constructed or reconstructed vehicle, the fact shall be noted on the application for title. The department may require evidence of prior registration of, or issuance of title for, the vehicle and may require the applicant to furnish additional information as it considers necessary to establish ownership, including bills of sale, invoices for vehicle equipment, or a surety bond.

The holder of a manufacturer’s certificate of origin for a manufactured home may deliver the certificate to any person to facilitate conveying or encumbering the manufactured home, and a person who receives the manufacturer’s certificate of origin holds it in trust for the person delivering it.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am §§ 12, 13 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (c), substituted “ ‘manufacturer’s certificate of origin’ ” for “ ‘manufacturer’s statement of origin’ ”; and added (f).

Sec. 28.10.215.
Vehicles for disabled. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.216.
Inadequate evidence of ownership.

When the department is not satisfied as to the ownership of a vehicle or believes that there may be undisclosed security interests in it, the department may register the vehicle but shall either

withhold issuance of a certificate of title until the applicant presents documents sufficient to satisfy the department

as to the ownership of the vehicle by applicant, and

that there are no undisclosed security interests in the vehicle; or

require the applicant, as a condition of the issuance of a certificate of title, to file with the department either

a bond in the form prescribed by the department and executed by the applicant, or

a deposit of cash.

A bond or cash deposit filed under (a)(2) of this section must be equal in amount to one and one-half times the value of the vehicle as determined by the department and be conditioned to indemnify former owners, secured parties, and subsequent purchasers of the vehicle and their successors against loss resulting from a defect in or undisclosed security interest on the title of the applicant. An injured party may sue on the bond for a breach of its conditions, but the liability of the surety or the department may not exceed the amount of the bond or deposit.

The bond or deposit shall be returned (1) at the end of three years from its filing, or (2) when the vehicle is no longer registered in the state if (2) is earlier and if the certificate of title is surrendered to the department. Service on the department of notice that action is pending to recover on the bond or the deposit extends the periods established in this subsection until 45 days after a final decision in the action on the bond or on the deposit.

History.

(§ 3 ch 54 SLA 1979)

Sec. 28.10.220.
Farm vehicles. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.221.
Refusal, suspension, and revocation of title.

The department may refuse to issue a certificate of title and may suspend or revoke a previously issued certificate of title when

the certificate of title was fraudulently procured or erroneously issued or required information or fees have not been provided;

the vehicle has been scrapped, dismantled, or destroyed beyond repair;

the vehicle has been reported to the department as stolen or unlawfully converted, until the department learns of the recovery of the vehicle or that the report of its theft or conversion was false or erroneous; or

authorized by any other provision of law.

Suspension or revocation of a certificate of title under (a) of this section does not affect the rights of a lienholder named on the certificate.

A certificate of title that is suspended or revoked shall be returned immediately to the department by the owner or other person lawfully entitled to possession of the certificate of title.

Except as provided in AS

28.10.263

, the department may not suspend or revoke a certificate of title to a manufactured home based on the fact that the manufactured home is affixed in any manner to real property.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, title, and transfer, see 2 AAC 92, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (d).

Sec. 28.10.230.
Sunday school buses. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.231.
Certificate of title contents.

A certificate of title issued by the department must contain

the date issued;

the name and residence and mailing address of the owner;

the name and address of the primary lienholder, if any;

a description of the vehicle including its make, year of manufacture, identification number; and

other information the department may reasonably require.

The certificate of title must contain a space for the assignment and warranty of title by the owner or dealer selling the vehicle and a space for the assignment or release of the security interest of a lienholder, and may contain forms for application for title by a transferee, and for the naming of a primary lienholder.

The department may not indicate on a certificate of title more than the primary lienholder and the primary registered owner when indicating lienholders and registered owners.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.240.
Proration of tax. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.241.
Delivery and judicial process against certificate of title.

The department shall deliver the certificate of title to the primary lienholder named in the certificate. Otherwise, delivery shall be to the registered owner.

A certificate of title for a vehicle is not subject to attachment, execution or other judicial process, but this section does not prevent a lawful levy upon the vehicle.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Sec. 28.10.250.
Special dealer tax. [Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.251.
Lost, stolen, or mutilated certificate of title.

If a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or becomes illegible, the first lienholder or, if none, the owner or legal representative of the owner named in the title as shown by the records of the department shall apply for and obtain a duplicate title upon furnishing information satisfactory to the department and payment of the prescribed fee. The duplicate title must indicate that it is a duplicate title, and it shall be mailed or delivered to the first lienholder named in it or, if none, to the registered owner.

A person who recovers an original title for which a duplicate has been issued shall immediately surrender the duplicate to the department.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978)

Secs. 28.10.255, 28.10.260.
Annual tax; certificate of title.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 178 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 28.10.261.
Evidence.

In a civil or criminal proceeding, when the title or right to possession of a vehicle is involved, the record of registrations and certificates of title as they appear in the files and records of the department are prima facie evidence of the ownership or right to possession. Proof of ownership or right to possession of a vehicle shall be made by a copy of the record certified by the department or by an original certificate of registration or title issued by the department.

Lien information indicated upon the title shall be accepted as prima facie evidence of legal ownership and the filing of a lien.

Notwithstanding another provision of law to the contrary, a certificate of title to a manufactured home issued by the department is prima facie evidence of the facts appearing on it, even if the manufactured home is affixed in any manner to real property.

History.

(§ 7 ch 178 SLA 1978; am § 15 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For a saving clause relating to interpretation of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 31, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (c).